California statutes. Vehicle Code
(1) The supplemental sticker clearly and conspicuously discloses in the largest print appearing on the sticker, other than the print size used for the dealer’s name, that the supplemental sticker price is the dealer’s asking price, or words of similar import, and that it is not the manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

(2) The supplemental sticker clearly and conspicuously discloses the manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

(3) The supplemental sticker lists each item that is not included in the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, and discloses the additional price of each item. If the supplemental sticker price is greater than the sum of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price
 and the price of the items added by the dealer, the supplemental sticker price shall set forth that difference and describe it as “added mark-up.”

(r) Advertise an underselling claim, including, but not limited to, “we have the lowest prices” or “we will beat any dealer’s price,” unless the dealer has conducted a recent survey showing that the dealer sells its vehicles at lower prices than another licensee in its trade area and maintains records to adequately substantiate the claims. The substantiating records shall be made available to the department upon request.

(s) (1) Advertise an incentive offered by the manufacturer or distributor if the dealer is required to contribute to the cost of the incentive as a condition of participating in the incentive program, unless the dealer discloses in a clear and conspicuous manner that dealer participation may affect
 consumer cost.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “incentive” means anything of value offered to induce people to purchase a vehicle, including, but not limited to, discounts, savings claims, rebates, below-market finance rates, and free merchandise or services.

(t) Display or offer for sale a used vehicle unless there is affixed to the vehicle the Federal Trade Commission’s Buyer’s Guide as required by Part 455 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(u) Fail to disclose in writing to the franchisor of a new motor vehicle dealer the name of the purchaser, date of sale, and the vehicle identification number of each new motor vehicle sold of the line-make of that franchisor, or intentionally submit to that franchisor a false name for the purchaser or false date for the date of sale.

(v) Enter into a contract for the retail sale of a motor vehicle unless the contract clearly and conspicuously discloses whether the vehicle is being sold as a new vehicle or a used vehicle, as defined in this code.

(w) Use a simulated check, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 22433 of the Business and Professions Code, in an advertisement for the sale or lease of a vehicle.

(x) Fail to disclose, in a clear and conspicuous manner in at least 10-point boldface type on the face of a contract for the retail sale of a new motor vehicle that this transaction is, or is not, subject to a fee received by an autobroker from the selling new motor vehicle dealer, and the name of the autobroker, if applicable.

(y) Sell or lease a new motor vehicle after October
 1, 2012, unless the dealer has a contractual agreement with the department to be a private industry partner pursuant to Section 1685. This subdivision does not apply to the sale or lease of a motorcycle or off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification under Section 38010 or a recreational vehicle as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(z) As used in this section, “make” and “model” have the same meaning as is provided in Section 565.12 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 187, Sec. 1.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.2.

It shall be unlawful and a violation of this code for any manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch licensed under this code to coerce or attempt to coerce any dealer in this state:

(a) To order or accept delivery of any motor vehicle, part or accessory thereof, appliance, equipment or any other commodity not required by law which shall not have been voluntarily ordered by the dealer.

(b) To order or accept delivery of any motor vehicle with special features, appliances, accessories or equipment not included in the
 list price of such motor vehicles as publicly advertised by the manufacturer or distributor.

(c) To order for any person any parts, accessories, equipment, machinery, tools, appliances, or any commodity whatsoever.

(d) To participate in an advertising campaign or contest, any promotional campaign, promotional materials, training materials, showroom or other display decorations or materials at the expense of the dealer.

(e) To enter into any agreement with the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch, or to do any other act prejudicial to the dealer by threatening to cancel a franchise or any contractual agreement existing between the dealer and manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch. Notice in good faith to any dealer of the dealer’s violation of any terms
 or provisions of such franchise or contractual agreement shall not constitute a violation of this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11713.1 (as added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 996) by Stats. 1979, Ch. 943.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.3.

It is unlawful and a violation of this code for a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch licensed pursuant to this code to do, directly or indirectly through an affiliate, any of the following:

(a) (1) To refuse or fail to deliver in reasonable quantities and within a reasonable time after receipt of an order from a dealer having a franchise for the retail sale of a new vehicle sold or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor, a new vehicle or parts or accessories to new vehicles that are of a model offered by the manufacturer or distributor to other franchisees in this state of the same line-make, if the vehicle, parts, or accessories are publicly advertised
 as being available for delivery or actually being delivered in this state. This subdivision is not violated, however, if the failure is caused by acts or causes beyond the control of the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch.

(2) To fail to disclose to any franchisee, upon written request, the basis upon which new motor vehicles of the same line-make are allocated or distributed to franchisees in the state and the basis upon which the current allocation or distribution is being made or will be made to the franchisee.

(b) To prevent or require, or attempt to prevent or require, by contract or otherwise, a change in the capital structure of a dealership or the means by or through which the dealer finances
 the operation of the dealership, if the dealer at all times meets reasonable capital standards agreed to by the dealer and the manufacturer or distributor, and if a change in capital structure does not cause a change in the principal management or have the effect of a sale of the franchise without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor.

(c) To prevent or require, or attempt to prevent or require, a dealer to change the executive management of a dealership, other than the principal dealership operator or operators, if the franchise was granted to the dealer in reliance upon the personal qualifications of that person.

(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (t), to prevent or require, or attempt to prevent or require, by contract or otherwise, a
 dealer, or an officer, partner, or stockholder of a dealership, the sale or transfer of a part of the interest of any of them to another person. A dealer, officer, partner, or stockholder shall not, however, have the right to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise, or a right thereunder, without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor except that the consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(2) (A) For the transferring franchisee to fail, prior to the sale, transfer, or assignment of a franchisee or the sale, assignment, or transfer of all, or substantially all, of the assets of the franchised business or a controlling interest in the franchised business to another person, to notify the manufacturer or distributor of the franchisee’s decision to sell, transfer, or assign the franchise. The notice shall be in writing
 and shall include all of the following:

(i) The proposed transferee’s name and address.

(ii) A copy of all of the agreements relating to the sale, assignment, or transfer of the franchised business or its assets.

(iii) The proposed transferee’s application for approval to become the successor franchisee. The application shall include forms and related information generally utilized by the manufacturer or distributor in reviewing prospective franchisees, if those forms are readily made available to existing franchisees. As soon as practicable after receipt of the proposed transferee’s application, the manufacturer or distributor shall notify the franchisee and the proposed transferee of information needed to make the
 application complete.

(B) For the manufacturer or distributor, to fail, on or before 60 days after the receipt of all of the information required pursuant to subparagraph (A), or as extended by a written agreement between the manufacturer or distributor and the franchisee, to notify the franchisee of the approval or the disapproval of the sale, transfer, or assignment of the franchise. The notice shall be in writing and shall be personally served or sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by guaranteed overnight delivery service that provides verification of delivery and shall be directed to the franchisee. A proposed sale, assignment, or transfer shall be deemed approved, unless disapproved by the franchisor in the manner provided by this subdivision. If the proposed sale, assignment, or transfer is disapproved, the franchisor shall
 include in the notice of disapproval a statement setting forth the reasons for the disapproval.

(3) In an action in which the manufacturer’s or distributor’s withholding of consent under this subdivision or subdivision (e) is an issue, whether the withholding of consent was unreasonable is a question of fact requiring consideration of all the existing circumstances.

(e) To prevent, or attempt to prevent, a dealer from receiving fair and reasonable compensation for the value of the franchised business. There shall not be a transfer or assignment of the dealer’s franchise without the consent of the manufacturer or distributor. The manufacturer or distributor shall not unreasonably withhold consent or condition consent upon the release, assignment, novation, waiver,
 estoppel, or modification of a claim or defense by the dealer.

(f) To obtain money, goods, services, or another benefit from a person with whom the dealer does business, on account of, or in relation to, the transaction between the dealer and that other person, other than for compensation for services rendered, unless the benefit is promptly accounted for, and transmitted to, the dealer.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), to obtain from a dealer or enforce against a dealer an agreement, provision, release, assignment, novation, waiver, or estoppel that does any of the following:

(A) Modifies or disclaims a duty or obligation of a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor,
 distributor branch, or representative, or a right or privilege of a dealer, pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 2.

(B) Limits or constrains the right of a dealer to file, pursue, or submit evidence in connection with a protest before the board.

(C) Requires a dealer to terminate a franchise.

(D) Requires a controversy between a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or representative and a dealer to be referred to a person for a binding determination. However, this subparagraph does not prohibit arbitration before an independent arbitrator, provided that whenever a motor vehicle franchise contract provides for the
 use of arbitration to resolve a controversy arising out of, or relating to, that contract, arbitration may be used to settle the controversy only if, after the controversy arises, all parties to the controversy consent in writing to use arbitration to settle the controversy. For the purpose of this subparagraph, the terms “motor vehicle” and “motor vehicle franchise contract” shall have the same meanings as defined in Section 1226 of Title 15 of the United States Code. If arbitration is elected to settle a dispute under a motor vehicle franchise contract, the arbitrator shall provide the parties to the arbitration with a written explanation of the factual and legal basis for the award.

(2) An agreement, provision, release, assignment, novation, waiver, or estoppel prohibited by this subdivision shall be unenforceable and void.

(3) This subdivision does not do any of the following:

(A) Limit or restrict the terms upon which parties to a protest before the board, civil action, or other proceeding can settle or resolve, or stipulate to evidentiary or procedural matters during the course of, a protest, civil action, or other proceeding.

(B) Affect the enforceability of any stipulated order or other order entered by the board.

(C) Affect the enforceability of any provision in a contract if the provision is not prohibited under this subdivision or any other law.

(D) Affect the enforceability of a provision in any contract entered
 into on or before December 31, 2011.

(E) Prohibit a dealer from waiving its right to file a protest pursuant to Section 3065.1 if the waiver agreement is entered into after a franchisor incentive program claim has been disapproved by the franchisor and the waiver is voluntarily given as part of an agreement to settle that claim.

(F) Prohibit a voluntary agreement supported by valuable consideration, other than granting or renewing a franchise, that does both of the following:

(i) Provides that a dealer establish or maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or display space or provides that a dealer make a material alteration, expansion, or addition to a dealership facility.

(ii) Contains no waiver or other provision prohibited by subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1).

(G) Prohibit an agreement separate from the franchise agreement that implements a dealer’s election to terminate the franchise if the agreement is conditioned only on a specified time for termination or payment of consideration to the dealer.

(H) (i) Prohibit a voluntary waiver agreement, supported by valuable consideration, other than the consideration of renewing a franchise, to waive the right of a dealer to file a protest under Section 3062 for the proposed establishment or relocation of a specific proposed dealership, if the waiver agreement provides all of the following:

(I) The approximate address at which the proposed dealership will be located.

(II) The planning potential used to establish the proposed dealership’s facility, personnel, and capital requirements.

(III) An approximation of projected vehicle and parts sales, and number of vehicles to be serviced at the proposed dealership.

(IV) Whether the franchisor or affiliate will hold an ownership interest in the proposed dealership or real property of the proposed dealership, and the approximate percentage of any franchisor or affiliate ownership interest in the proposed dealership.

(V) The line-makes to be operated at the proposed dealership.

(VI) If known at the time the waiver agreement is executed, the identity of the dealer who will operate the proposed dealership.

(VII) The date the waiver agreement is to expire, which may not be more than 30 months after the date of execution of the waiver agreement.

(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of a waiver agreement entered into pursuant to the provisions of this subparagraph, a dealer may file a protest under Section 3062 if any of the information provided pursuant to clause (i) has become materially inaccurate since the waiver agreement was executed. Any determination of the enforceability of a waiver agreement shall be determined by the board and the franchisor shall have the burden of proof.

(h) To increase prices of motor vehicles that the dealer had ordered for private retail consumers prior to the dealer’s receipt of the written official price increase notification. A sales contract signed by a private retail consumer is evidence of the order. In the event of manufacturer price reductions, the amount of the reduction received by a dealer shall be passed on to the private retail consumer by the dealer if the retail price was negotiated on the basis of the previous higher price to the dealer. Price reductions apply to all vehicles in the dealer’s inventory that were subject to the price reduction. Price differences applicable to new model or series motor vehicles at the time of the introduction of new models or series shall not be considered a price increase or price decrease. This subdivision does not apply to price changes caused
 by either of the following:

(1) The addition to a motor vehicle of required or optional equipment pursuant to state or federal law.

(2) Revaluation of the United States dollar in the case of a foreign-make vehicle.

(i) To fail to pay to a dealer, within a reasonable time following receipt of a valid claim by a dealer thereof, a payment agreed to be made by the manufacturer or distributor to the dealer by reason of the fact that a new vehicle of a prior year model is in the dealer’s inventory at the time of introduction of new model vehicles.

(j) To deny the widow, widower, or heirs designated by a deceased owner of a dealership the opportunity to participate
 in the ownership of the dealership or successor dealership under a valid franchise for a reasonable time after the death of the owner.

(k) To offer refunds or other types of inducements to a person for the purchase of new motor vehicles of a certain line-make to be sold to the state or a political subdivision of the state without making the same offer to all other dealers in the same line-make within the relevant market area.

(l) To modify, replace, enter into, relocate, terminate, or refuse to renew a franchise in violation of Article 4 (commencing with Section 3060) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 3070) of Chapter 6 of Division 2.

(m) To employ a person as a representative who has not been licensed
 pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11900) of Chapter 4 of Division 5.

(n) To deny a dealer the right of free association with another dealer for a lawful purpose.

(o) (1) To compete with their franchisees in the sale, lease, or warranty service of new motor vehicles.

(2) A manufacturer, branch, or distributor, or an entity that controls or is controlled by a manufacturer, branch, or distributor, shall not, however, be deemed to be competing in the following limited circumstances:

(A) Owning or operating a dealership for a temporary period, not to exceed one year at the location of a former dealership of the same line-make that has been out of operation for less than six months. However, after a showing of good cause by a manufacturer, branch, or distributor that it needs additional time to operate a dealership in preparation for sale to a successor independent franchisee, the board may extend the time period.

(B) Owning an interest in a dealer as part of a bona fide dealer development program that satisfies all of the following requirements:

(i) The sole purpose of the program is to make franchises available to persons lacking capital, training, business experience, or other qualities
 ordinarily required of prospective franchisees and the dealer development candidate is an individual who is unable to acquire the franchise without assistance of the program.

(ii) The dealer development candidate has made a significant investment subject to loss in the franchised business of the dealer.

(iii) The program requires the dealer development candidate to manage the day-to-day operations and business affairs of the dealer and to acquire, within a reasonable time and on reasonable terms and conditions, beneficial ownership and control of a majority interest in the dealer and disassociation of any direct or indirect ownership or control by the manufacturer, branch, or distributor.

(C) Owning a wholly owned subsidiary
 corporation of a distributor that sells motor vehicles at retail, if, for at least three years prior to January 1, 1973, the subsidiary corporation has been a wholly owned subsidiary of the distributor and engaged in the sale of vehicles at retail.

(3) (A) A manufacturer, branch, and distributor that owns or operates a dealership in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall give written notice to the board, within 10 days,
 each time it commences or terminates operation of a dealership and each time it acquires, changes, or divests itself of an ownership interest.

(B) A manufacturer, branch, and distributor that owns an interest in a dealer in the manner described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall give written notice to the board, annually, of the name and location of each dealer in which it has an ownership interest, the name of the bona fide dealer development owner or owners, and the ownership interests of each owner expressed as a percentage.

(4) In addition to the exceptions identified in paragraphs (2) and (3), a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch, or an affiliate thereof, shall not be deemed to be competing with their franchisees in any of the
 following limited circumstances:

(A) When directly providing an update to or repair of motor vehicle software, if the update or repair is provided over-the-air at no cost.

(B) When creating a new line of motor vehicles and using new or existing franchisees to sell and service those vehicles.

(C) When authorizing a fleet operator or other third party, such as a government entity or a commercial or rental fleet operator, to perform warranty service work on fleet vehicles owned or operated by a fleet owner, operator or other third party, provided that the franchisor does not prohibit or prevent the fleet operator or other third party from obtaining warranty service work from a franchisee of the same line-make.

(D) When owning or operating a dealership for the fleet sale or service of autonomous vehicles, provided that the dealership is of a line-make that does not have franchisees and the dealership does not engage in the sale of consumer goods, as defined by Section 1761 of the Civil Code.

(E) For the purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions shall apply:

(i) “Autonomous vehicles” shall have the same meaning as “autonomous vehicle” in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 38750.

(ii) “Fleet vehicles” shall mean five or more vehicles under common ownership or operation.

(iii) “Fleet sale” shall mean a sale to a person that owns, operates, or maintains fleet vehicles.

(5) For the purposes of this subdivision, “warranty” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 3065.25.

(p) (1) To unfairly discriminate among its franchisees with respect to warranty reimbursement or authority granted to its franchisees to make warranty adjustments with retail customers.

(2) (A) To require a franchisee to perform service repair or warranty work on any vehicle model that is not currently available to the franchisee for sale or lease as a new vehicle.

(B) This subdivision shall not apply to any vehicle model that is not currently commercially available as a new vehicle. Nothing in this
 subdivision prohibits a franchisee and a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or affiliate from entering into a voluntary written agreement, signed by both parties, to perform service repair or warranty work on any vehicle model provided that the warranty work is reimbursed at the retail labor rate and retail parts rate as established pursuant to Section 3065.2.

(3) As used in this subdivision, “warranty” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 3065.25.

(q) To sell vehicles to a person not licensed pursuant to this chapter for resale.

(r) To fail to affix an identification number to a park trailer, as described in Section 18009.3 of the Health and Safety Code, that is manufactured
 on or after January 1, 1987, and that does not clearly identify the unit as a park trailer to the department. The configuration of the identification number shall be approved by the department.

(s) To dishonor a warranty, rebate, or other incentive offered to the public or a dealer in connection with the retail sale of a new motor vehicle, based solely upon the fact that an autobroker arranged or negotiated the sale. This subdivision shall not prohibit the disallowance of that rebate or incentive if the purchaser or dealer is ineligible to receive the rebate or incentive pursuant to any other term or condition of a rebate or incentive program.

(t) To exercise a right of first refusal or other right requiring a
 franchisee or an owner of the franchise to sell, transfer, or assign to the franchisor, or to a nominee of the franchisor, all or a material part of the franchised business or of the assets of the franchised business unless all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The franchise authorizes the franchisor to exercise a right of first refusal to acquire the franchised business or assets of the franchised business in the event of a proposed sale, transfer, or assignment.

(2) The franchisor gives written notice of its exercise of the right of first refusal no later than 45 days after the franchisor receives all of the information required pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) The sale, transfer, or assignment being proposed relates to not less than all or substantially all of the assets of the franchised business or to a controlling interest in the franchised business.

(4) The proposed transferee is neither a family member of an owner of the franchised business, nor a managerial employee of the franchisee owning 15 percent or more of the franchised business, nor a corporation, partnership, or other legal entity owned by the existing owners of the franchised business. For purposes of this paragraph, a “family member” means the spouse of an owner of the franchised business, the child, grandchild, brother, sister, or parent of an owner, or a spouse of one of those family members. This paragraph
 does not limit the rights of the franchisor to disapprove a proposed transferee as provided in subdivision (d).

(5) Upon the franchisor’s exercise of the right of first refusal, the consideration paid by the franchisor to the franchisee and owners of the franchised business shall equal or exceed all consideration that each of them were to have received under the terms of, or in connection with, the proposed sale, assignment, or transfer, and the franchisor shall comply with all the terms and conditions of the agreement or agreements to sell, transfer, or assign the franchised business.

(6) The franchisor shall reimburse the proposed transferee for expenses paid
 or incurred by the proposed transferee in evaluating, investigating, and negotiating the proposed transfer to the extent those expenses do not exceed the usual, customary, and reasonable fees charged for similar work done in the area in which the franchised business is located. These expenses include, but are not limited to, legal and accounting expenses, and expenses incurred for title reports and environmental or other investigations of real property on which the franchisee’s operations are conducted. The proposed transferee shall provide the franchisor a written itemization of those expenses, and a copy of all nonprivileged reports and studies for which expenses were incurred, if any, within 30 days after the proposed transferee’s receipt of a written request from the franchisor for that accounting. The franchisor shall make payment within 30 days after exercising the right of first refusal. 

(7) The franchisor does not use, or threaten to use, the exercise of the right of first refusal in bad faith.

(u) (1) To unfairly discriminate in favor of a dealership owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by a manufacturer or distributor or an entity that controls or is controlled by the manufacturer or distributor. Unfair discrimination includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The furnishing to a franchisee or dealer that is owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by a manufacturer, branch, or distributor of any of the following:

(i) A vehicle that is not made available to each franchisee pursuant to a reasonable
 allocation formula that is applied uniformly, and a part or accessory that is not made available to all franchisees on an equal basis when there is no reasonable allocation formula that is applied uniformly.

(ii) A vehicle, part, or accessory that is not made available to each franchisee on comparable delivery terms, including the time of delivery after the placement of an order. Differences in delivery terms due to geographic distances or other factors beyond the control of the manufacturer, branch, or distributor shall not constitute unfair competition.

(iii) Information obtained from a franchisee by the manufacturer, branch, or distributor concerning the business affairs or operations of a franchisee in which the manufacturer, branch, or distributor does not have an ownership
 interest. The information includes, but is not limited to, information contained in financial statements and operating reports, the name, address, or other personal information or buying, leasing, or service behavior of a dealer, customer, and other information that, if provided to a franchisee or dealer owned or controlled by a manufacturer or distributor, would give that franchisee or dealer a competitive advantage. This clause does not apply if the information is provided pursuant to a subpoena or court order, or to aggregated information made available to all franchisees.

(iv) Sales or service incentives, discounts, or promotional programs that are not made available to all California franchises of the same line-make on an equal basis.

(B) Referring a prospective purchaser
 or lessee to a dealer in which a manufacturer, branch, or distributor has an ownership interest, unless the prospective purchaser or lessee resides in the area of responsibility assigned to that dealer or the prospective purchaser or lessee requests to be referred to that dealer.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit a franchisor from granting a franchise to prospective franchisees or assisting those franchisees during the course of the franchise relationship as part of a program or programs to make franchises available to persons lacking capital, training, business experience, or other qualifications ordinarily required of prospective franchisees.

(v) (1) To access, modify, or extract information from a confidential dealer computer record, as defined in
 Section 11713.25, without obtaining the prior written consent of the dealer and without maintaining administrative, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the security, confidentiality, and integrity of the information.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not limit a duty that a dealer may have to safeguard the security and privacy of records maintained by the dealer.

(w) (1) To use electronic, contractual, or other means to prevent or interfere with any of the following:

(A) The lawful efforts of a dealer to comply with federal and state data security and privacy laws.

(B) The ability of a dealer to do either of the following:

(i) Ensure that specific data accessed from the dealer’s computer system is within the scope of consent specified in subdivision (v).

(ii) Monitor specific data accessed from or written to the dealer’s computer system.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not limit a duty that a dealer may have to safeguard the security and privacy of records maintained by the dealer.

(x) (1) To unfairly discriminate against a franchisee selling a service contract, debt cancellation agreement, maintenance agreement, or similar product not approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate.
 For purposes of this subdivision, unfair discrimination includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Express or implied statements that the dealer is under an obligation to exclusively sell or offer to sell service contracts, debt cancellation agreements, maintenance agreements, or similar products approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate.

(B) Express or implied statements that selling or offering to sell service contracts, debt cancellation agreements, maintenance agreements, or similar products not approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate, or the failure to sell or offer to sell
 service contracts, debt cancellation agreements, maintenance agreements, or similar products approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate will have any negative consequences for the dealer.

(C) Measuring a dealer’s performance under a franchise agreement based upon the sale of service contracts, debt cancellation agreements, maintenance agreements, or similar products approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate.

(D) Requiring a dealer to actively promote the sale of service contracts, debt cancellation agreements, maintenance agreements, or similar products approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the
 manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate.

(E) Conditioning access to vehicles, parts, or vehicle sales or service incentives upon the sale of service contracts, debt cancellation agreements, maintenance agreements, or similar products approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate.

(F) Requiring a dealer to provide a disclosure or notice different from the notice set forth in paragraph (4) of this subdivision for the sale of the service contracts.

(2) Unfair discrimination does not include, and nothing shall prohibit a manufacturer from, offering an incentive program to vehicle dealers who
 voluntarily sell or offer to sell service contracts, debt cancellation agreements, or similar products approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch or affiliate, if the program does not provide vehicle sales or service incentives.

(3) This subdivision does not prohibit a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch from requiring a franchisee that sells a used vehicle as “certified” under a certified used vehicle program established by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch to provide a service contract approved, endorsed, sponsored, or offered by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch.

(4) Unfair
 discrimination does not include, and nothing shall prohibit a franchisor from requiring a franchisee to provide, the following notice prior to the sale of the service contract if the service contract is not provided or backed by the franchisor and the vehicle is of the franchised line-make:

“Service Contract Disclosure
The service contract you are purchasing is not provided or backed by the manufacturer of the vehicle you are purchasing. The manufacturer of the vehicle is not responsible for claims or repairs
 under this service contract.
_____________________
Signature of Purchaser”
(y) (1) To take or threaten to take any adverse action against a dealer pursuant to an export or sale-for-resale prohibition because the dealer sold or leased a vehicle to a customer who either exported the vehicle to a foreign country or resold the vehicle in violation of the prohibition, unless the export or sale-for-resale prohibition policy was provided to the dealer in writing at least 48 hours before the sale or lease of the vehicle, and the dealer knew or reasonably should have known of the customer’s intent to export or resell the vehicle in violation of the prohibition. If the dealer causes the vehicle to be registered in this or any other state, and collects or causes to
 be collected any applicable sales or use tax due to this state, a rebuttable presumption is established that the dealer did not have reason to know of the customer’s intent to export or resell the vehicle. In a proceeding in which a challenge to an adverse action is at issue, the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence to show that the vehicle was exported or resold in violation of an export or sale-for-resale prohibition policy, that the prohibition policy was provided to the dealer in writing at least 48 hours prior to the sale or lease, and that the dealer knew or reasonably should have known of the customer’s intent to export the vehicle to a foreign country at the time of the sale or lease.

(2) An export or sale-for-resale prohibition
 policy shall not include a provision that expressly or implicitly requires a dealer to make further inquiries into a customer’s intent, identity, or financial ability to purchase or lease a vehicle based on any of the customer’s characteristics listed or defined in Section 51 of the Civil Code. A policy that is in violation of this paragraph is void and unenforceable.

(3) An export or sale-for-resale prohibition policy shall expressly include a provision stating the dealer’s rebuttable presumption if the dealer causes the vehicle to be registered in this or any other state and collects or causes to be collected any applicable sales or use tax. A policy that is in violation of this paragraph is void and unenforceable.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “adverse action” means any
 activity that imposes, either expressly or implicitly, a burden, responsibility, or penalty on a dealer, including, but not limited to, nonroutine or nonrandom audits, withholding of incentives, or monetary chargebacks, imposed by the manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch, or through an affiliate.

(z) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Affiliate” means a person who directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under the common direction and control with, another person. “Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of any person.

(2) “Area of responsibility” means a geographic area specified in a franchise that is used by the franchisor for the purpose of evaluating the franchisee’s performance of its sales and service obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 332, Sec. 4.   (AB 473)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11713.4.
